California, session 20252026, AB719.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8593.9 of the Government Code is amended to read:8593.9. (a) Each county shall review and update its emergency plan at least every two years.(a)(b) The Office of Emergency Services shall, by January 1, 2022, shall develop best practices for counties developing and updating a county emergency plan.(b)(c) The Office of Emergency Services shall, by January 1, 2022, shall establish a process for a county to request the office to review the county’s emergency plan. Upon the conclusion of the review process, the office shall provide technical assistance and feedback regarding the sufficiency of the county’s emergency plan with the following elements:(1) Whether the plan is consistent with the office’s proposed best practices.(2) Whether the plan protects and accommodates vulnerable populations during natural disasters.(3) Whether the plan has established procedures for alerting, evacuating, and sheltering individuals during an emergency.(4) Any other necessary and appropriate element, as determined by the office.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.